Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.050

Employment of personnel—Expenditures authorized.

The commission may employ personnel, including attorneys, and make any other expenditures necessary for the effective performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers. The commission may hire attorneys or others by personal service contract to conduct initial proceedings regarding a complaint against a judge or justice. Commission employees shall be exempt from the civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW.

[ 1989 c 367 s 3; 1981 c 268 s 6.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—1989 c 367: See note following RCW 2.64.010.